test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_paavir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - päävir: # 2B 
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: pävirin  #pápárin
    päävir+N+Par: pävirid  #pápárid
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá

  Noun - veeskir: # 2B 
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäsˊkárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäsˊkárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäsˊkáráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: veeskirttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess: veˊskirin  #pápárin
    veeskir+N+Par: veˊskirid  #pápárid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäsˊkáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäsˊkárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäsˊkárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäsˊkáráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäsˊkárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: viäsˊkárijguin
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäsˊkárijttáá

  Noun - eebir: # 2A
    eebir+N+Sg+Nom: eebir
    eebir+N+Sg+Gen: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Acc: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Ill: iäbˊbárân
    eebir+N+Sg+Loc: iäbˊbárist
    eebir+N+Sg+Com: iäbˊbáráin
    eebir+N+Sg+Abe: iäbˊbárttáá
    eebir+N+Ess: ebirin
    eebir+N+Par: ebirid
    eebir+N+Pl+Nom: iäbˊbáreh
    eebir+N+Pl+Gen: iäbˊbárij
    eebir+N+Pl+Acc: iäbˊbárijd
    eebir+N+Pl+Ill: iäbˊbáráid
    eebir+N+Pl+Loc: iäbˊbárijn
    eebir+N+Pl+Com: iäbˊbárijguin
    eebir+N+Pl+Abe: iäbˊbárijttáá
